Arkansas, session 2025, SB446.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 12-12-1802, concerning definitions with
respect to the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, is amended to add
an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) "Private landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial
business" means a landowner, leaseholder, or commercial business that is not
a governmental entity.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code §§ 12-12-1803 — 12-12-1805 are amended to
read as follows:
12-12-1803. Restrictions on use.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, it is
unlawful for an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability
*CEB200*
03/12/2025 11:14:00 AM CEB200

SB446
company, association, or the State of Arkansas, its agencies, and political
subdivisions to use an automatic license plate reader system.
(b) An automatic license plate reader system may be used:
(1) By a state, county, or municipal law enforcement agency for
the comparison of captured plate data with data held by the Office of Motor
Vehicle, the Arkansas Crime Information Center, the National Crime
Information Center, a database created by law enforcement for the purposes of
an ongoing investigation, and the Federal Bureau of Investigation for any
lawful purpose;
(2) By parking enforcement entities for regulating the use of
parking facilities;
(3) For the purpose of controlling access to secured areas; or
(4) By a private landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial
business for the purpose of promoting public safety, deterring crime, and
monitoring access to private property owned or leased by the private
landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial business, including ingress and
egress to private property on a private road owned by the private landowner,
private leaseholder, or commercial business; or
(5)(A) By the Arkansas Highway Police Division of the Arkansas
Department of Transportation for the electronic verification of registration,
logs, and other compliance data to provide more efficient movement of
commercial vehicles on a state highway.
(B) An automatic license plate reader system used under
subdivision (b)(4)(A) (b)(5)(A) of this section shall be installed at an
entrance ramp at a weigh station facility for the review of a commercial
motor vehicle entering the weigh station facility.

12-12-1804. Protections.
(a) Captured Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section,
captured plate data obtained for the purposes described under § 12-12-1803(b)
shall not be used or shared for any other purpose and shall not be preserved
for more than:
(1) Sixty (60) days by a private landowner, private leaseholder,
or commercial business; or
(2) one One hundred fifty (150) days by all other eligible
entities.
03/12/2025 11:14:00 AM CEB200

SB446
(b) Captured plate data obtained by an entity under § 12-12-1803(b)(1)
may be retained as part of an ongoing investigation and shall be destroyed at
the conclusion of either:
(1) An investigation that does not result in any criminal
charges being filed; or
(2) Any criminal action undertaken in the matter involving the
captured plate data.
(c) A governmental entity that uses an automatic license plate reader
system under § 12-12-1803(b)(1) shall update the captured plate data
collected under this subchapter every twenty-four (24) hours if updates are
available.
(d)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (d)(2) of this section, a
governmental entity authorized to use an automatic license plate reader
system under § 12-12-1803(b) shall not sell, trade, or exchange captured
plate data for any purpose.
(2) Captured plate data obtained by a law enforcement agency
under § 12-12-1803(b)(1) that indicates evidence of an offense may be shared
with other law enforcement agencies.
(3) A governmental entity may only compel the release of
captured plate data from a user under § 12-12-1803(b)(2), § 12-12-1803(b)(3),
§ 12-12-1803(b)(4), or § 25-16-705(a) through a valid subpoena.
(e)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, a
private landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial business authorized to
use an automatic license plate reader system under § 12-12-1803(b) shall not
sell, trade, or exchange captured plate data for any commercial purpose.
(2)(A) Captured plate data obtained by a private landowner,
private leaseholder, or commercial business under § 12-12-1803(b)(4) may be
shared with a third-party processor providing asset protection analytical
services on the captured plate data as part of a contractual agreement with
the private landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial business.
(B) The terms of the contractual agreement shall expressly
prohibit a third-party processor from using the captured data for any other
purpose and impose a data retention period not to exceed sixty (60) days from
receipt of the captured plate data.

12-12-1805. Practice and usage data preservation.
03/12/2025 11:14:00 AM CEB200

SB446
(a) An entity that uses an automatic license plate reader system under
§ 12-12-1803(b)(1), § 12-12-1803(b)(2), § 12-12-1803(b)(3), or § 12-12-
1803(b)(5) shall:
(1) Compile statistical data identified in subsection (b) of
this section every six (6) months into a format sufficient to allow the
general public to review the compiled data; and
(2) Preserve the compiled data for eighteen (18) months; and
(3)(A) Promulgate rules and policies concerning the manner and
method of obtaining, retaining, and destroying captured plate data, including
without limitation specific rules and policies concerning retention of
material in excess of one hundred fifty (150) days under § 12-12-1804(b), and
make those rules and policies available for public inspection.
(B) Failure to comply with subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this
section shall be grounds for a court of competent jurisdiction to exclude any
evidence obtained under this subchapter.
(b) The preserved data shall include:
(1) The number of license plates scanned;
(2) The names of the lists against which captured plate data
were checked; and
(3) For each check of captured plate data against a list:
(A) The number of confirmed matches;
(B) The number of matches that upon further investigation
did not correlate to an alert; and
(C) The number of matches that resulted in arrest and
prosecution; and
(4)(A) Promulgate rules and policies concerning the manner and
method of obtaining, retaining, and destroying captured plate data, including
without limitation specific rules and policies concerning retention of
material in excess of one hundred fifty (150) days under § 12-12-1804(b) and
make those rules and policies available for public inspection.
(B) Failure to comply with subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this
section shall be grounds for a court of competent jurisdiction to exclude any
evidence obtained under this subchapter.
(c) A private landowner, private leaseholder, or commercial business
that uses and automatic license plate reader system under § 12-12-1803(b)(4)
shall:
03/12/2025 11:14:00 AM CEB200

SB446
(1) Compile statistical data every six (6) months that includes
the:
(A) Number of license plates scanned; and
(B) Number of confirmed matches; and
(2) Make reports of the compiled plate data available in a
timely manner to the Legislative Council upon a request from the chairs of
the Legislative Council.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-12-1807, concerning the penalties for a
violation of the Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, is amended to add
an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The Attorney General may bring an action to enforce a violation of
this subchapter under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.























03/12/2025 11:14:00 AM CEB200